New York, session 2025-2026, S10581.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 490 of the laws of 2017 amending the 2 insurance law relating to limits on certain supplementary insurance, as 3 amended by chapter 181 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 6 it shall have become a law, and shall apply to new insurance policies 7 and contracts issued on and after such effective date and shall expire 8 and be deemed repealed June 30, [2026] 2029. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15867-01-6